Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.175.150

PASS program—Graduation coach.

For the purposes of RCW 28A.175.145, a "graduation coach" means a staff person, working in consultation with counselors, who is assigned to identify and provide intervention services to students who have dropped out or are at risk of dropping out of school or of not graduating on time through the following activities:

(1) Monitoring and advising on individual student progress toward graduation;

(2) Providing student support services and case management;

(3) Motivating students to focus on a graduation plan;

(4) Encouraging parent and community involvement;

(5) Connecting parents and students with appropriate school and community resources;

(6) Securing supplemental academic services for students;

(7) Implementing school-wide dropout prevention programs and interventions; and

(8) Analyzing data to identify at-risk students.

[ 2011 c 288 s 6.]